Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Chapter 11

Formal Defects in Proceedings

20-11-101. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-11-101 (Code 1858; § 2863 (deriv. Acts 1809 (Sept.), ch. 49, § 21); Shan., § 4583; Code 1932, § 8707; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1501), concerning defects not ground for abatement, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 273, § 5.

20-11-102. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-11-102 (Code 1858, § 2864 (deriv. Acts 1811, ch. 72, § 14); Shan., § 4584; mod. Code 1932, § 8708; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1502), concerning defects in appeals was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 1(4). For present provisions, see T.R.A.P. 2, 3.

20-11-103. Defective verdict.

Any defect in entering a verdict where there are different issues, or the verdict is not responsive to the issues, shall be objected to before judgment is entered, or the objection will be considered waived.

Code 1858, § 2873 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 152, § 7); Shan., § 4593; Code 1932, § 8717; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1509.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 116; 24 Tenn. Juris., Verdict, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Waiting for the Jury (George W. Jenkins III), 20 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 31 (1984).

20-11-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-11-104 (Code 1858, § 2874 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 152, § 7); Shan., § 4594; mod. Code 1932, § 8718; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1510), concerning jurisdictional defects on appeal was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 1(4). For present provisions, see T.R.A.P. 2, 3, 13.

20-11-105. Penal and qui tam actions.

This chapter shall apply to penal and qui tam as well as civil actions.

Code 1858, § 2871 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 152, § 6); Shan., § 4591; mod. Code 1932, § 8715; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1511.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Amendments, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Judgments and Appeal, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 373.

20-11-106, 20-11-107. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§20-11-106 and20-11-107 (Acts 1978, ch. 813, § 1; 1978, ch. 856, § 1; 1979, ch. 399, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A., §§ 20-1512, 20-1513), concerning the correction of a judgment or decree and the correction of a mistake apparent in a record, were repealed by Acts 1989, ch. 106, § 1.

Tenn. R. Civ. P. 60.01 was intended to supersede §§20-11-106 and20-11-107. See the Advisory Commission Comments to that rule.

20-11-108. General sessions court proceedings on appeal.

In appeals from courts of general sessions, the circuit court shall supply any defect in the proceedings of the inferior jurisdiction, as though the suit had been commenced in the circuit court.

Code 1858, § 2875 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 21; 1837-1838, ch. 130, § 1); Shan., § 4595; Code 1932, § 8719; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1514.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Amendments, §§ 2, 7, 10, 17; 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 50, 51, 67; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 41.

Law Reviews.

The Pauper's Oath in Appeals From General Sessions Court (Robert A. Lanier), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1983).

Cited: Spencer v. Dixie Finance Co., 205 Tenn. 485, 327 S.W.2d 301, 1959 Tenn. LEXIS 387 (1959).

20-11-109. Copy of lost paper.

If an original process, pleading or paper in a cause is lost or withheld by any person, the court may, at any stage of the suit, authorize its place to be supplied by a copy to be used instead of the original.

Code 1858, § 2876; Shan., § 4596; mod. Code 1932, § 8720; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1515.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Lost Instruments and Records, § 12.

The General Sessions Court (Hall), § 178.

Cited: Pennington v. General Motors Corp., 49 Tenn. App. 240, 354 S.W.2d 479, 1961 Tenn. App. LEXIS 108 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1961).